Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.020

Duties of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Notify elementary, middle, and junior high schools about the Washington college bound scholarship program using methods in place for communicating with schools and school districts; and

(2) Work with the office of student financial assistance to develop application collection and student tracking procedures.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 227; 2007 c 405 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.